Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1236
Personal property; taxpayer; inspection by county assessor; authorized; subpoena; disobedience; contempt proceedings; confidentiality.

For the purpose of determining the net book value of any property, the county assessor shall have the right to demand of the owner or his or her agent or employee an inspection of the following for the year preceding assessment: Inventories; all books of accounts; depreciation schedules filed with the Internal Revenue Service; and workpapers, worksheets, or any other item prepared by or for a taxpayer and not filed with the Internal Revenue Service. If the owner, agent, or employee refuses such demand, the county assessor shall have authority to issue subpoenas to compel the appearance of such owner or agent and employee, together with such papers, books, accounts, and documents as the county assessor may deem necessary, and at such time the county assessor may administer oaths and take testimony. In case of disobedience on the part of any person to comply with any subpoena issued by or on behalf of the county assessor or of the refusal of any witness to testify on any matters regarding which he or she may be lawfully interrogated, it shall be the duty of the district court for any county or of the judge thereof, on application by the county assessor, to compel obedience by proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from such court or a refusal to testify therein.

All documentation provided by the owner or owner's agent or employee pursuant to this section shall be confidential and available to taxing officials only.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 57, p. 404;

R.S.1913, § 6344;

C.S.1922, § 5945;

C.S.1929, § 77-1432;

R.S.1943, § 77-1236;

Laws 1959, c. 365, § 12, p. 1290;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 104;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 77;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 56.

Inventory of merchant may be considered in determining value of personal property. L. J. Messer Co. v. Board of Equalization of Jefferson County, 171 Neb. 393, 106 N.W.2d 478 (1960).